scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cw.yaml
     atis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidatiswaa
     atis+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odatiswaan
     atis+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: atiswaad
     atis+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: etiswaad
     azhaas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhaaswaa
     azhaas+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhaaswaan
     azhaas+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhaaswaad
     azhaas+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhaaswaad
     azhaas+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhaas
     azheda'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazheda'waa
     azheda'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazheda'waan
     azheda'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azheda'waad
     azheda'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezheda'waad
     azheda'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azheda'
     azheweba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazheweba'waa
     azheweba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazheweba'waan
     azheweba'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azheweba'waad
     azheweba'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezheweba'waad
     azheweba'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azheweba'
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaba'waa
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaba'waa
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaaba'waa
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaaba'waa
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: niyaaba'og
     aaba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaba'waan
     aaba'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaba'waad
     aaba'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaba'waad
     aaba'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaba' 
     aabaabika'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabaabika'waa
     aabaabika'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabaabika'waa
     aabaabika'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabaabika'waa
     aabaabika'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaabika'waan
     aabaabika'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabaabika'waad
     aabaabika'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabaabika'waad
     aabaabika'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabaabika' 
     aabooda'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabooda'waa
     aabooda'wi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabooda'waan
     aabooda'wi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabooda'waad
     aabooda'wi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabooda'wi
     aada'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaada'waa
     aada'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaada'waan
     aada'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aada'waad
     aada'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaada'waad
     aada'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aada'
     aajinike'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaajinike'waa
     aajinike'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaajinike'waan
     aajinike'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aajinike'waad
     aajinike'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaajinike'waad
     aajinike'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aajinike'
     aama'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaama'waa
     aama'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaama'waa
     aama'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaama'waan
     aama'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aama'waad
     aama'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aamwa'
     aama'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aama'wi
     aaswaakwa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaswaakwa'waa
     aaswaakwa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaswaakwa'waan
     aaswaakwa'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaswaakwa'waad
     aaswaakwa'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaswaakwa'
     aaswaakwa'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaswaakwa'wi
